Maryland, session 2025, SB0141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
8–111.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) IS AT LEAST 60 YEARS OLD; AND
(2) HAS BEEN IMPRISONED FOR AT LEAST 20 YEARS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0141*

SENATE BILL 141
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY
FILE A MOTION WITH THE COURT TO REDUCE THE DURATION OF ANY SENTENCE
THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS CURRENTLY SERVING AND ANY CONSECUTIVE SENTENCE.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
COURT SHALL CONDUCT A HEARING ON A MOTION TO REDUCE THE DURATION OF A
SENTENCE.
(2) (I) THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE PRESENT AT THE HEARING,
UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL WAIVES THE RIGHT TO BE PRESENT.
(II) THE REQUIREMENT THAT THE INDIVIDUAL BE PRESENT AT
THE HEARING IS SATISFIED IF THE HEARING IS CONDUCTED BY VIDEO CONFERENCE.
(3) (I) THE INDIVIDUAL MAY INTRODUCE EVIDENCE IN SUPPORT
OF THE MOTION AT THE HEARING.
(II) THE STATE MAY INTRODUCE EVIDENCE IN SUPPORT OF OR
IN OPPOSITION TO THE MOTION AT THE HEARING.
(4) NOTICE OF THE HEARING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
GIVEN TO THE VICTIM OR THE VICTIM’S REPRESENTATIVE AS PROVIDED IN §§
11–104 AND 11–503 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(5) IF THE COURT HAS PREVIOUSLY CONDUCTED A HEARING AND
RULED ON A PRIOR MOTION UNDER THIS SECTION OR § 8–110 OF THIS SUBTITLE
WITHIN THE PRECEDING 5 YEARS, THE COURT MAY:
(I) IF GOOD CAUSE IS SHOWN, CONDUCT A HEARING; OR
(II) IF GOOD CAUSE IS NOT SHOWN, DENY THE MOTION WITHOUT
CONDUCTING A HEARING.
(D) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AFTER A HEARING
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT MAY REDUCE THE DURATION
OF A SENTENCE OF AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT A DANGER TO THE PUBLIC; AND
(2) THE INTERESTS OF JUSTICE WILL BE BETTER SERVED BY A
REDUCED SENTENCE.

SENATE BILL 141 3
(E) IF APPLICABLE TO THE INDIVIDUAL AND PRESENTED TO THE COURT, A
COURT SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING FACTORS WHEN DETERMINING WHETHER
TO REDUCE THE DURATION OF A SENTENCE UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL’S AGE AT THE TIME THE MOTION IS FILED;
(2) THE NATURE OF THE OFFENSE AND THE HISTORY AND
CHARACTERISTICS OF THE INDIVIDUAL;
(3) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL HAS SUBSTANTIALLY COMPLIED WITH
THE RULES OF THE INSTITUTION IN WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL HAS BEEN CONFINED;
(4) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL HAS COMPLETED AN EDUCATIONAL,
VOCATIONAL, OR OTHER PROGRAM;
(5) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL HAS DEMONSTRATED MATURITY,
REHABILITATION, AND FITNESS TO REENTER SOCIETY SUFFICIENT TO JUSTIFY A
SENTENCE REDUCTION;
(6) ANY STATEMENT OFFERED BY A VICTIM OR A VICTIM’S
REPRESENTATIVE;
(7) ANY REPORT OF A PHYSICAL, MENTAL, OR BEHAVIORAL
EXAMINATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL CONDUCTED BY A HEALTH PROFESSIONAL;
(8) THE INDIVIDUAL’S FAMILY AND COMMUNITY CIRCUMSTANCES AT
THE TIME OF THE OFFENSE, INCLUDING ANY HISTORY OF TRAUMA;
(9) THE REDUCTION IN RECIDIVISM THAT GENERALLY OCCURS AS
PEOPLE AGE; AND
(10) ANY OTHER FACTOR THAT THE COURT DEEMS RELEVANT.
(F) (1) IF THE COURT HOLDS A HEARING ON A MOTION UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE COURT SHALL ISSUE ITS DECISION TO GRANT OR DENY THE MOTION
IN WRITING OR ON THE RECORD IN OPEN COURT.
(2) (I) THE DECISION SHALL ADDRESS THE FACTORS LISTED IN
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT A FACTOR LISTED IN
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION IS NOT APPLICABLE TO THE INDIVIDUAL OR

SENATE BILL 141
EVIDENCE SUPPORTING THE FACTOR IS NOT PRESENTED TO THE COURT, THE
COURT SHALL MAKE NOTE OF THE FACTORS NOT CONSIDERED IN ITS DECISION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.